Louisiana, session 2026, HB905.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 17:3217(B)(1) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§3217. University of Louisiana System
* * *
B.(1) A state maritime academy, the Universities of Louisiana Maritime
Academy at Nicholls State University, is hereby established for the purposes of
leveraging and coordinating existing maritime programs and facilities, providing for
the training of merchant marine officers, and providing for additional educational
pathways aligned with the workforce needs of the maritime industry.
* * *
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 1 of 1
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.